District of Columbia statutes.
2-423

Damages.

Upon a finding by the judge of unjust imprisonment in accordance with the standards set by § 2-422, the judge may award damages. Punitive damages may not be awarded.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-143, § 4, 27 DCR 4656
1981 Ed., § 1-1223.